Mississippi, session 2026, HB4113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1)  The Board of Supervisors of Perry County, Mississippi, in its discretion, is authorized, by resolution duly adopted and entered on its minutes, to levy an assessment, in addition to any other assessments and court costs, not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00) per case, for each civil case filed in any justice court of Perry County and for each misdemeanor conviction and/or non-adjudication obtained in any justice court of such county. (2)  The avails of the additional assessment imposed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be expended by the Board of Supervisors of Perry County to fund repairs, upgrades, reconstruction, operation, furnishing, technology and maintenance of the Perry County Justice Court Building.  For the purposes of reconstruction, repairs and upgrades of the justice court building, the funds availed under subsection (1) may also be used for matching purposes for grants, if any. (3)  The provisions of this section shall be repealed from and after July 1, 2030. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.